Illinois, session 104th, SB2853.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 20-15 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/20-15)7    Sec. 20-15. Information on bill or separate statement. 8There shall be printed on each bill, or on a separate slip 9which shall be mailed with the bill:10        (a) a statement itemizing the rate at which taxes have 11    been extended for each of the taxing districts in the 12    county in whose district the property is located, and in 13    those counties utilizing electronic data processing 14    equipment the dollar amount of tax due from the person 15    assessed allocable to each of those taxing districts, 16    including a separate statement of the dollar amount of tax 17    due which is allocable to a tax levied under the Illinois 18    Local Library Act or to any other tax levied by a 19    municipality or township for public library purposes,20        (b) a separate statement for each of the taxing 21    districts of the dollar amount of tax due which is 22    allocable to a tax levied under the Illinois Pension Code 23    or to any other tax levied by a municipality or township   SB2853- 2 -LRB104 17808 TRT 31241 b1    for public pension or retirement purposes,2        (b-1) the dollar amount of tax due that is used to fund 3    a Veterans Assistance Commission under Section 5-2006 of 4    the Counties Code, 5        (b-5) a list of each tax increment financing (TIF) 6    district in which the property is located, the dollar 7    amount of tax due that is allocable to the TIF district, 8    and each redevelopment project that (i) is associated with 9    the TIF district and (ii) has been completed during or 10    before the taxable year for which the bill is prepared or 11    is in the process of being completed during that taxable 12    year, 13        (c) the total tax rate,14        (d) the total amount of tax due, and15        (e) the amount by which the total tax and the tax 16    allocable to each taxing district differs from the 17    taxpayer's last prior tax bill.18    The county treasurer shall ensure that only those taxing 19districts in which a parcel of property is located shall be 20listed on the bill for that property.21    In all counties the statement shall also provide:22        (1) the property index number or other suitable 23    description,24        (2) the assessment of the property,25        (3) the statutory amount of each homestead exemption 26    applied to the property,   SB2853- 3 -LRB104 17808 TRT 31241 b1        (4) the assessed value of the property after 2    application of all homestead exemptions, 3        (5) the equalization factors imposed by the county and 4    by the Department, and5        (6) the equalized assessment resulting from the 6    application of the equalization factors to the basic 7    assessment.8    In all counties which do not classify property for 9purposes of taxation, for property on which a single family 10residence is situated the statement shall also include a 11statement to reflect the fair cash value determined for the 12property. In all counties which classify property for purposes 13of taxation in accordance with Section 4 of Article IX of the 14Illinois Constitution, for parcels of residential property in 15the lowest assessment classification the statement shall also 16include a statement to reflect the fair cash value determined 17for the property.18    In all counties, the statement must include information 19that certain taxpayers may be eligible for tax exemptions, 20abatements, and other assistance programs and that, for more 21information, taxpayers should consult with the office of their 22township or county assessor and with the Department of 23Revenue. For bills mailed on or after January 1, 2026, the 24statement must include, in bold face type, a list of 25exemptions available to taxpayers and contact information for 26the chief county assessment officer.   SB2853- 4 -LRB104 17808 TRT 31241 b1    In counties which use the estimated or accelerated billing 2methods, these statements shall only be provided with the 3final installment of taxes due. The provisions of this Section 4create a mandatory statutory duty. They are not merely 5directory or discretionary. The failure or neglect of the 6collector to mail the bill, or the failure of the taxpayer to 7receive the bill, shall not affect the validity of any tax, or 8the liability for the payment of any tax.9(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.)